Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. In General

§ 33-3-101.
Citation.

This act may be cited as the “Certified Public Accountant’s Act of 2005”. This act applies only to certified public accountants and certified public accountant firms and those who hold themselves out to be a certified public accountant or a certified public accountant firm.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.52; Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “2005” for “1975,” and added the second sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-3-102(a)(xv).

Cited

in

Dorr v. State Bd. of CPAs, 2001 WY 37, 21 P.3d 735,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2001).

§ 33-3-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Board” means the Wyoming board of certified public accountants created by W.S.

33-3-103

;

“State” means any state of the United States excluding Wyoming, any territory or insular possession of the United States or the District of Columbia;

Masculine terms when used in this act shall include the feminine;

“Permit” means a permit to engage in the practice of public accounting as a “certified public accountant firm” issued by the board under W.S.

33-3-118

and

33-3-120

which has not expired, been revoked or suspended;

“Examination” means a written examination described in W.S. 33-3-109(a)(iv);

“Attest service” means any of the financial statement services described in the following subparagraphs. The statements on standards specified in the following subparagraphs shall be adopted by reference by the board pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and shall be those developed for general application by recognized national accountancy organizations such as the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and the public company accounting oversight board:

Any audit or other engagement performed in accordance with the statements on auditing standards;

Any review of a financial statement to be performed in accordance with the statements on standards for accounting and review services;

Any examination of prospective financial information to be performed in accordance with the statement on standards for attestation engagements;

Any engagement to be performed in accordance with the auditing standards of the public company accountancy oversight board;

Any examination, review or agreed upon procedures engagement to be performed in accordance with the statement on standards for attestation engagements other than examinations described in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph.

“Certificate” means a certificate as “certified public accountant” issued under this act or corresponding provisions of prior law, or a corresponding certificate as certified public accountant issued after examination under the law of any other state;

“Certified public accountant firm” means any form of organization allowed by state law that has been issued a permit under this act;

“Compilation service” means providing a service to be performed in accordance with the statements on standards for accounting and review services the objective of which is to assist management in the presentation of financial statements and to report on that information without undertaking to obtain or provide any assurance that there are no material modifications that should be made to the financial statements in order for them to be in accordance with the applicable financial reporting framework;

“Home office” means the location specified by the client as the address to which a service described in W.S. 33-3-116(a)(iv) is directed;

“License” means an active certified public accountant certificate or any other comparable document issued by any other state based on completing education, examination and experience requirements;

“NASBA” means the national association of state boards of accountancy;

“Principal place of business” means the office location designated by the licensee for purposes of substantial equivalency and reciprocity;

“Substantial equivalency” is a determination by the board or its designee that the education, examination and experience requirements contained in the statutes and administrative rules of another jurisdiction are comparable to or exceed the education, examination and experience requirements of W.S. 33-3-116(c)(i) or that an individual certified public accountant’s education, examination and experience are comparable to or exceed the education, examination and experience requirements of W.S. 33-3-116(c)(i). In ascertaining substantial equivalency the board shall take into account the qualifications without regard to the sequence in which experience, education or examination requirements were attained;

“This act” means W.S.

33-3-101

through

33-3-201

.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.53; Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 1; 2009, ch. 99, § 1; 2019 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), substituted “this act” for “the Certified Public Accountant's Act of 1975”; in (a)(iv) inserted “firm” after “certified public accountant,” and substituted “W.S.

33-3-118

and

33-3-120

” for “W.S.

33-3-120

”; added (a)(vi) through (a)(x); and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (a)(vi), redesignated former (a)(x) as (a)(xv) and added (a)(x) through (a)(xiv).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(vi)(C), deleted “or,” added (a)(vi)(E), and in (a)(ix), substituted “the objective of which is to assist management in the presentation” for “that is presented in the form,” “and to report on that information” for “information that is the representation of the client, the client’s management or owners,” “obtain or provide” for “express,” “that there are no material modifications that should be made to” for “on,” and added “financial” and “in order for them to be in accordance with the applicable financial reporting framework.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-3-103.
Wyoming board of certified public accountants; creation; members; vacancies; removal; reappointment.

There is created a Wyoming board of certified public accountants. The board shall consist of five (5) members appointed by the governor. Members of the board shall be citizens of the United States and residents of Wyoming. Four (4) members of the board shall be persons who hold certified public accountant certificates issued under the laws of Wyoming and are in good standing as certified public accountants. One (1) member of the board shall be a member of the general public. The members of the board first to be appointed shall hold office, one (1) for one (1) year, two (2) for two (2) years and two (2) for three (3) years from July 1, 1975, the term of each to be designated by the governor. Their successors shall be appointed for terms of three (3) years. Vacancies occurring during a term shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term. Upon the expiration of his term of office a member shall continue to serve until his successor is appointed and qualified. The governor shall remove any member from the board whose certificate has been revoked or suspended, and may remove any member of the board as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. No person, who has served two (2) successive complete terms of one (1), two (2) or three (3) years is eligible for reappointment until after the lapse of one (1) year. An appointment to fill an unexpired term is not considered a complete term.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.54; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2005, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “accountant” for “account.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the fourth sentence and deleted the former fifth sentence, eliminating provisions pertaining to active practice, and substituted “certificate” for “permit.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

Wyoming Bd. of CPAs v. Christensen, 800 P.2d 853,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1990).

§ 33-3-104.
Board chairman; board secretary; regulations; quorum; seal; records.

The board shall elect annually a chairman and a secretary from its members. The secretary shall report to the board regarding revenue receipts and review reports of all fees and other money received by the board. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The board shall have a seal which shall be judicially noticed. The board shall keep records of its proceedings. The board may employ personnel and arrange for any assistance it may require in the performance of its duties.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.55; 2019 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "report to the board regarding revenue receipts" for "receive"; and substituted "review reports of" for "account for".

§ 33-3-105.
Register; contents.

The board shall maintain on its website a register that contains the names of all certified public accountants, the names of the members of the board and other matters deemed proper by the board.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.56; Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 1; 2019 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “holding permits” after “certified public accountants,” and substituted “made available to each certificate holder who requests a copy” for “mailed to each permit holder.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "maintain on its website a" for "prepare for public distribution, in July of each year, an annual", substituted "that contains" for "which shall contain", deleted ", arranged alphabetically by classifications," and deleted "Copies of the register shall be made available to each certificate holder who requests a copy."

§ 33-3-106.
Compensation of board members; expenses.

Each member of the board shall receive as salary the sum paid each day to members of the state legislature, for each day spent in the discharge of his official duties and mileage and per diem allowance as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii). Compensation, reimbursement of expenses and all other obligations incurred by the board shall be paid from the certified public accountant’s account.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.57; Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 1; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to meal, lodging and traveling expenses of state officers and employees, see §

9-3-102

.

As to amount of mileage fee or mileage expenses to state, county or precinct officer or employee, see §

9-3-103

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “receive as salary the sum paid each day to members of the state legislature” for “be paid an amount, not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00).”

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “as allowed to state employees” in the first sentence.

§ 33-3-107.
Fees; collection; certified public accountant’s account; disbursements; transfer of existing funds.

All fees collected under the provisions of this act shall be remitted by the board to the state treasurer according to policy set by the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall deposit all collections and other funds of the board in a separate account. All funds of any organization of certified public accountants held by the Wyoming state treasurer on the effective date of this act shall be transferred to and become a part of the certified public accountant’s account.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.58; Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the trust and agency fund” from the end of the second and third sentences.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, deleted the former third sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “remitted” for “paid” and “to the treasurer” for “into the Wyoming state treasury” in the first sentence; and substituted “state treasurer shall deposit” for “Wyoming state treasurer shall account for” in the second sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, deleted "the secretary of" and "at the end of each month" and added "according to policy set by the state treasurer."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-3-102(a)(xv).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 33-3-108.
Rules and regulations; procedure.

The board shall prescribe rules and regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of this act as it deems consistent with, or required by, the public welfare. The rules and regulations shall include:

Rules of procedure for governing the conduct of matters before the board;

Rules of professional conduct for establishing and maintaining high standards of competence and integrity for certified public accountants in the profession of public accountancy;

Regulations governing educational and experience requirements for issuance of the certificate of certified public accountant, and further educational requirements, and not exceeding one hundred twenty (120) hours for each three (3) year period, to be met from time to time by certificate holders in order to maintain their professional knowledge and competence, as a condition to continuing in the practice of public accountancy as a certified public accountant;

Regulations governing certified public accountant firms practicing public accounting which use the title “certified public accountant”, including but not limited to rules concerning style, name, title and affiliation with any other organization;

Rules governing the determination of substantial equivalence for practice privileges or the issuance of certificates;

Rules exempting certificate holders from maintaining active, inactive or retired status as determined by the board;

Rules establishing miscellaneous fees and fee collection relating to licensing and enforcement operations in accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

.

All rules and regulations of the board shall be promulgated in compliance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

].

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.59; Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 1; 2006, ch. 57, § 1; 2009, ch. 99, § 1; 2019 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(iii), inserted “and experience” after “Regulations governing educational,” and substituted “certificate” for “permit”; in (a)(iv), substituted “certified public accountant firms” for “corporations”; and added (a)(v).

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (a), inserted “or foreign,” substituted “when the issuing state's or foreign country's certificate, licensure or credentialing” for “from any state when the state's certificate, or licensure” in (v); added (vi) and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “practice privileges or” preceding “the issuance” for “under W.S.

33-3-116

to individuals who hold valid certified public accountant certificates, licenses or foreign credentials when the issuing state's or foreign country's certificate, licensure or credentialing requirements are substantially equivalent to those under this act as determined by the board” in (a)(v).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (a)(vii).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-3-102(a)(xv).

There is no impermissible delegation of authority

by the state regulatory agency in requiring certified public audits to conform to existent national standards of accounting practice. Christensen v. Wyoming Bd. of Certified Pub. Accountants, 838 P.2d 723,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1992).

Standard of review is whether decision supported by evidence. —

Reviewing court will not separately undertake a factual analysis following the administrative agencies determination; the authority to make discretional decisions about standards of CPA auditing practices is invested exclusively in the State Board, and therefore the review standard is a determination of whether the decision can be supported by evidence found in the entire record. Christensen v. Wyoming Bd. of Certified Pub. Accountants, 838 P.2d 723,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1992).

Cited

in

Wyoming Bd. of CPAs v. Christensen, 800 P.2d 853,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1990).

§ 33-3-109.
Certified public accountant; qualifications.

An active certificate of “certified public accountant” shall be granted by the board to any person:

Who is a resident of Wyoming or has a place of business in Wyoming, or as an employee, is regularly employed in Wyoming; and

Who has attained the age of majority in Wyoming; and

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 2.

Who has passed a written examination in accounting and auditing and other related subjects the board determines to be appropriate; and

Who, prior to January 1, 2012, meets the requirements of subparagraphs (A) and (B) or subparagraphs (C) and (D) of this paragraph or, on or after January 1, 2012, meets the requirements of subparagraphs (C) and (D) of this paragraph:

Earned a baccalaureate degree conferred by a college or university recognized by the board, with a total education program to include an accounting concentration or equivalent as determined to be appropriate by the rules and regulations of the board, or what the board determines to be substantially the equivalent of the foregoing;

Completed at least four (4) years of full-time experience in the practice of public accounting. The experience shall include providing any type of service or advice involving the use of accounting skills, any auditing, review or compilation service, any management advisory or financial advisory service, or any tax or consulting service. Experience shall be verified by an active certified public accountant or the equivalent as determined by the board, or by providing representative samples of work as determined by the board. The experience shall be acceptable if it is gained through employment in government, industry, academia or public accounting;

Completed at least one hundred fifty (150) semester hours of college education including a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or university acceptable to the board, the total educational program to include an accounting concentration or equivalent as determined to be appropriate by the rules and regulations of the board;

Completed at least one (1) year of full-time experience in the practice of public accounting. The experience shall include providing any type of service or advice involving the use of accounting skills, any auditing, review, or compilation service, any management advisory or financial advisory service, or any tax or consulting service. Experience shall be verified by an active certified public accountant or the equivalent as determined by the board, or by providing representative samples of work as determined by the board. The experience shall be acceptable if it is gained through employment in government, industry, academia or public accounting.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 77, § 2.

As used in this act, “the practice of certified public accounting” means holding oneself out to the public or otherwise in such a manner as to state or imply that one is:

Skilled in the practice of accounting and auditing;

Qualified to express any form of assurance on financial statements;

Qualified to express opinions on financial statements for credit purposes, for use in the courts or for other purposes involving third party reliance on these financial statements; or

Skilled in the provision of any accounting service including recording and summarizing financial transactions, analyzing and verifying financial information, reporting financial results to an employer, clients or other parties and rendering tax or management advisory services to any employer, clients or other parties.

There shall be a reasonable annual certificate fee to be established by board rules in accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

. All certificates shall expire on the last day of December of each year and may be renewed annually for a period of one (1) year by certificate holders and registrants who meet the requirements specified in subsection (e) of this section and upon payment of the annual fee. In accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

the board may by rule establish a fee in addition to the annual certificate fee to reactivate an expired certificate.

Applications for renewal of an active certificate shall be accompanied by evidence of satisfaction of the continuing education requirements during the three (3) years preceding the application. Failure by an individual applicant to furnish this evidence shall constitute grounds for nonrenewal under W.S.

33-3-121

, unless the board determines the failure is due to reasonable cause or excusable neglect. The board may renew a certificate despite the failure to furnish evidence of satisfaction of the requirements of continuing education upon the condition that the applicant follow a particular future program or schedule of continuing education. In issuing rules, regulations and individual orders regarding requirements of continuing education, the board may use and rely upon guidelines and pronouncements of recognized educational and professional associations, may prescribe the content, duration and organization of courses, shall take into account the applicant’s access to continuing education courses and any impediments to the interstate practice of certified public accounting which may result from differences in these requirements in other states and may provide for relaxation or suspension of the requirements for applicants who certify that they do not intend to engage in the practice of certified public accountancy or for instances of individual hardship.

Persons holding a certificate issued under W.S.

33-3-109

or

33-3-116

but who do not practice public accounting in Wyoming and have not lost the right to active status may place the certificate on an inactive status. A person with a certificate on inactive status shall pay an annual inactive fee not exceeding one-half (1/2) the annual fee charged to active certificate holders. All inactive status certificates shall expire on the last day of December of each year and may be renewed annually for a period of one (1) year. If the fee is not paid by December 31, a late fee as set by board rule in accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

, may be added to the annual fee. A person classified as inactive may assume or use the title or designation “certified public accountant” or the abbreviation “CPA” and shall use the words “inactive” adjacent to the designation “CPA” or “certified public accountant”.

The board by regulation may allow persons to retire the certificate. A person classified as retired shall pay a fee to be established by board rule in accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

. A person classified as retired may assume or use the title or designation “certified public accountant” or the abbreviation “CPA” and shall use the words “retired” adjacent to the designation “CPA” or “certified public accountant”.

Any individual certificate holder or individual with practice privileges who is responsible for supervising attestation services or compilation services or who signs or authorizes someone to sign the accountant’s report on the financial statements shall meet the experience or competency requirements set forth in the professional standards for such services.

Nothing in subsection (c) of this section shall be construed to prohibit public accountants from providing the services listed in subsection (c) of this section as long as the public accountant does not hold himself out to be a certified public accountant.

The board shall issue a certificate to a holder of a substantially equivalent foreign designation who meets the requirements of paragraphs (a)(i) and (ii) of this section provided that:

The foreign authority which granted the designation makes similar provision to allow a person who holds a valid certificate issued by this state to obtain the foreign authority’s comparable designation; and

The foreign designation:

Was issued by a foreign authority that regulates the practice of certified public accountancy and the foreign designation has not expired or been revoked or suspended;

Entitles the holder to issue reports upon financial statements; and

Was issued upon the basis of educational, examination and experience requirements established by the foreign authority or by law; and

The applicant:

Received the designation based on educational and examination standards substantially equivalent to those in effect in this state at the time the foreign designation was granted;

Completed an experience requirement substantially equivalent to the requirements of subparagraph (a)(v)(D) of this section in the jurisdiction which granted the foreign designation or has completed four (4) years of professional experience in this state or meets equivalent requirements within the ten (10) years immediately preceding the application as prescribed by board rule; and

Passed a uniform qualifying examination in national standards acceptable to the board.

An applicant for a certificate under subsection (k) of this section shall list in the application all jurisdictions, foreign and domestic, in which the applicant has applied for or holds a designation to practice public accountancy. Each holder of a certificate issued under subsection (k) of this section shall notify the board in writing within thirty (30) days after its occurrence of any issuance, denial, revocation or suspension of a designation or commencement of a disciplinary or enforcement action by any jurisdiction.

The board has sole authority to interpret the application of the provisions of subsections (k) and (m) of this section.

An active certificate of “certified public accountant” shall be granted by the board to any person who makes application and demonstrates eligibility under the substantial equivalency standard when the person establishes a principal place of business in this state. Qualifications may be established through a designee as provided in board rule.

An active certificate of “certified public accountant” may be granted by the board to any person who makes application but does not meet the eligibility under the substantial equivalency standard upon a showing:

The applicant passed the uniform certified public accountant examination; and

The applicant had four (4) years of experience of the type set forth in subparagraph (a)(v)(D) of this section within the ten (10) years immediately preceding the application as prescribed by board rule.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.60; Laws 1993, ch. 77, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 1, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2009, ch. 99, § 1; 2019 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), inserted “active” before “certificate”; repealed former (a)(iii)(A) and (B), which provided that a person who had earned a baccalaureate degree with a concentration in accounting prior to December 31, 1999, or who had met the eligibility requirement to apply for the examination given pursuant to W.S.

33-3-110

after December 31, 1999, could be granted a certified public accountant certificate; added (a)(v); and added (c) through (j).

The 2006 amendment,

deleted “or” at the end of (a)(v)(B).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in the introductory language of (a)(v), inserted “, prior to January 1, 2012,” preceding “meets” and added “or, on or after January 1, 2012, meets the requirements of subparagraphs (C) and (D) of this paragraph”; in (d), rewrote the first sentence, substituted “(e)” for “(a)” following “subsection” in the second sentence, and substituted “by board rule in accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

may be” for “by the board not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) shall be” in the third sentence; inserted “certified” preceding “public accounting” and “public accountancy” in (e); substituted “by board rule in accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

may be” for “by the board not in excess of seventy-five dollars ($75.00), shall be” in (f); substituted “a fee to be established by board rule in accordance with W.S. 33-1-201” for “a one-time fee of fifty dollars ($50.00)” in the second sentence of (g); inserted “or individual with practice privileges” following “certificate holder” in (h); and added (k) through (p).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (d), substituted "In accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

the board may by rule establish a fee in addition to the annual certificate fee to reactivate an expired certificate." for "If the annual certificate fee is not paid by the first day of November, a late renewal fee as set by board rule in accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

may be added to the renewal fee"; in (f) substituted "may" for "shall", substituted "with a certificate on" for "classified as", added "status", added "All inactive status certificates shall expire on the last day of December of each year and may be renewed annually for a period of one (1) year."; in (k) added "who meets the requirements of paragraphs (a)(i) and (ii) of this section"

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 2, repealed (a)(ii)(A) and (B). The introductory language in (a)(iii) has been repealed at the direction of the legislative service office.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-3-102(a)(xv).

Conflicting Legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 33-3-110.
Examinations and special tests; when held; use of prepared questions and grading service.

The examination shall be held not less frequently than once each year. The board may make use of any part of the uniform certified public accountant examination and advisory grading service as the board deems appropriate to assist it in performing its duties. The board may administer a special test designed to test skills of foreign accountants. The special test shall be administered in conjunction with the examination as often as may be necessary.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.61; Laws 1993, ch. 77, § 1.

§ 33-3-111.
Candidate for examination; eligibility.

A candidate is eligible to take the examination when he has met the requirements of W.S. 33-3-109(a)(i) and (ii) and has completed a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or university acceptable to the board, with a total educational program that includes an accounting concentration or its equivalent as determined to be appropriate by the rules and regulations of the board.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.62; Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 1; 2017 ch. 168, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “W.S. 33-3-109(a)(v)” for “W.S. 33-3-109(a)(iii).”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote the section which formerly read: “A candidate who has met the education requirement specified in
W.S. 33-3-109(a)(v), or who expects to meet the requirements within ninety (90) days following the examination, or with respect to whom the requirement has been waived, is eligible to take the examination when he has met the requirements of
W.S. 33-3-109(a)(i) and (ii). When any candidate is admitted to the examination on the expectation that he will complete the education requirement within ninety (90) days, no certificate shall be issued, nor shall credit for any part of the examination be given, unless the requirement is in fact completed within that time or within the time the board in its discretion may determine upon application.”

§ 33-3-112.
Reexamination; waiting period; credit for parts passed in other states.

The board may by regulation prescribe the terms and conditions under which a candidate who passes one (1) or more of the subjects of the examination may be reexamined in only the remaining subjects, with credit for the subjects previously passed. It may also provide by regulation for a reasonable waiting period for a candidate’s reexamination in any subject he has failed.

The board may provide by regulation for granting credit to a candidate for his satisfactory completion of any subject of the examination given by the licensing authority in any state. The regulations shall include the requirements the board determines to be appropriate in order that any examination approved as a basis for any credit shall be at least as thorough as the most recent examination given by the board at the time of the granting of the credit.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.63; 2019 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b), added a period and deleted ", if when he took the examination in another state he was not a resident of Wyoming or, as an employee, was not regularly employed in Wyoming."

§ 33-3-113.
Examination, reexamination and test fees.

The board shall establish fees for all examinations as determined by rules and regulations of the board in accordance with the requirements of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, as follows:

In an amount sufficient to ensure funds adequate to administer the examination required by W.S.

33-3-110

;

In an amount sufficient to ensure funds adequate to administer the special test to foreign applicants authorized by W.S.

33-3-110

.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 77, § 2.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.64; Laws 1983, ch. 112, § 1; 1993, ch. 77, §§ 1, 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See §§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

.

§ 33-3-114.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1, provided for temporary certificate and permits.

Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 33-3-115.
Certified public accountants; certificates under prior law.

Persons who hold certified public accountant certificates issued under prior laws of Wyoming are not required to obtain additional certificates or register under the provisions of this act, but are subject to all other provisions of this act. Certificates issued under prior law shall be considered certificates issued under the provisions of this act. All certificate holders who maintained the certificate on inactive status under prior law may continue to hold the certificate pursuant to the terms of this act without meeting additional experience requirements under W.S. 33-3-109(a)(v). All certificate holders whose principal place of business is in this state and who provide services in Wyoming as defined in W.S. 33-3-109(c) shall maintain the certificate on active status. All certificate holders whose principal place of business is not in this state and who are not eligible for practice privileges as provided in W.S.

33-3-116

and who provide service in this state as defined in W.S. 33-3-109(c) shall maintain the certificate on active status. Certificate holders who are eligible for practice privileges as provided in W.S.

33-3-116

may elect to maintain the Wyoming certificate pursuant to W.S. 33-3-109(d) through (f).

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.66; Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 1; 2009, ch. 99, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “on July 1, 1975” after “certificates” in the first sentence, and added the last two sentences.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “whose principal place of business is in this state and” following “certificate holders” in the fourth sentence and added the fifth and sixth sentences.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-3-102(a)(xv).